Illinois, session 104th, SB1640.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Vital Records Act is amended by changing 5Sections 11 and 18 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 535/11)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 73-11)7    Sec. 11. Information required on forms. 8    (a) The form of certificates, reports, and other returns 9required by this Act or by regulations adopted under this Act 10shall include as a minimum the items recommended by the 11federal agency responsible for national vital statistics, 12subject to approval of and modification by the Department. All 13forms shall be prescribed and furnished by the State Registrar 14of Vital Records.15    (b) On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act 16of 1983, all forms used to collect information under this Act 17which request information concerning the race or ethnicity of 18an individual by providing spaces for the designation of that 19individual as "white" or "black", or the semantic equivalent 20thereof, shall provide an additional space for a designation 21as "Hispanic".22    (c) Effective November 1, 1990, the social security 23numbers of the mother and father shall be collected at the time   SB1640- 2 -LRB104 08847 BDA 18902 b1of the birth of the child. These numbers shall not be recorded 2on the certificate of live birth. The numbers may be used only 3for those purposes allowed by Federal law.4    (d) The social security number of a person who has died 5shall be entered on the death certificate; however, failure to 6enter the social security number of the person who has died on 7the death certificate does not invalidate the death 8certificate.9    (e) If the place of disposition of a dead human body or 10cremated remains is in a cemetery, the burial permit shall 11include the place of disposition. The place of disposition 12shall include the lot, block, section, and plot or niche, and 13depth, if applicable, where the dead human body or cremated 14remains are located. The decision with respect to burial or 15cremation shall be made by the authorized person and shall be 16properly communicated to relevant persons within 7 days after 17a death. The funeral director shall indicate the name of 18cemetery on the death certificate within 7 days before burial. 19This subsection does not apply to cremated remains scattered 20in a cemetery. 21    (f) The death certificate for an individual with a history 22of military service may include or may be amended to include 23the branch of the military that the deceased individual served 24in, the period of time that he or she served in the military, 25and whether a military service-related injury contributed to 26the cause of death.   SB1640- 3 -LRB104 08847 BDA 18902 b1(Source: P.A. 103-406, eff. 1-1-25.) 2    (410 ILCS 535/18)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 73-18)3    Sec. 18. (1) Each death which occurs in this State shall be 4registered by filing a death certificate with the local 5registrar of the district in which the death occurred or the 6body was found, within 7 days after such death (within 5 days 7if the death occurs prior to January 1, 1989) and prior to 8cremation or removal of the body from the State, except when 9death is subject to investigation by the coroner or medical 10examiner. If a death occurs in this State in a county outside 11the deceased's county of residence, the local registrar of the 12district in which the death certificate was filed shall, 13within 7 days of its filing, send a copy of the death 14certificate to the local registrar in the district where the 15deceased's county of residence is located. 16        (a) For the purposes of this Section, if the place of 17    death is unknown, a death certificate shall be filed in 18    the registration district in which a dead body is found, 19    which shall be considered the place of death.20        (b) When a death occurs on a moving conveyance, the 21    place where the body is first removed from the conveyance 22    shall be considered the place of death and a death 23    certificate shall be filed in the registration district in 24    which such place is located.25        (c) The administrator of the nursing home, hospital,   SB1640- 4 -LRB104 08847 BDA 18902 b1    or hospice facility where the death occurred funeral 2    director who first assumes custody of a dead body shall be 3    responsible for creating the death registration file in 4    the system under Section 18.5, and the funeral director 5    who first assumes custody of a dead body shall be 6    responsible for filing a completed death certificate. He 7    or she shall obtain the personal data from the next of kin 8    or the best qualified person or source available; he or 9    she shall enter on the certificate the name, relationship, 10    and address of the informant; he or she shall enter the 11    date, place, and method of final disposition; he or she 12    shall affix his or her own signature, which may be 13    electronic, and enter his or her address; and shall 14    present the certificate to the person responsible for 15    completing the medical certification of cause of death. 16    The person responsible for completing the medical 17    certification of cause of death must note the presence of 18    methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus, clostridium 19    difficile, or vancomycin-resistant enterococci if it is a 20    contributing factor to or the cause of death. Additional 21    multi-drug resistant organisms (MDROs) may be added to 22    this list by the Department by rule.23    (2) The medical certification shall be completed and 24signed within 48 hours after death by the certifying health 25care professional who, within 12 months prior to the date of 26the patient's death, was treating or managing treatment of the   SB1640- 5 -LRB104 08847 BDA 18902 b1patient's illness or condition which resulted in death, except 2when death is subject to the coroner's or medical examiner's 3investigation. In the absence of the certifying health care 4professional or with his or her approval, the medical 5certificate may be completed and signed by his or her 6associate physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or 7physician assistant, the chief medical officer of the 8institution in which death occurred, or the physician who 9performed an autopsy upon the decedent. 10    (3) When a death occurs without medical attendance, or 11when it is otherwise subject to the coroner's or medical 12examiner's investigation, the coroner or medical examiner 13shall be responsible for the completion of a coroner's or 14medical examiner's certificate of death and shall sign the 15medical certification within 48 hours after death, except as 16provided by regulation in special problem cases. If the 17decedent was under the age of 18 years at the time of his or 18her death, and the death was due to injuries suffered as a 19result of a motor vehicle backing over a child, or if the death 20occurred due to the power window of a motor vehicle, the 21coroner or medical examiner must send a copy of the medical 22certification, with information documenting that the death was 23due to a vehicle backing over the child or that the death was 24caused by a power window of a vehicle, to the Department of 25Children and Family Services. The Department of Children and 26Family Services shall (i) collect this information for use by   SB1640- 6 -LRB104 08847 BDA 18902 b1Child Death Review Teams and (ii) compile and maintain this 2information as part of its Annual Child Death Review Team 3Report to the General Assembly. 4    (3.5) The medical certification of cause of death shall 5expressly provide an opportunity for the person completing the 6certification to indicate that the death was caused in whole 7or in part by a dementia-related disease, Parkinson's Disease, 8or Parkinson-Dementia Complex.9    (4) When the deceased was a veteran of any war of the 10United States, the funeral director shall prepare a 11"Certificate of Burial of U. S. War Veteran", as prescribed 12and furnished by the Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs, 13and submit such certificate to the Illinois Department of 14Veterans' Affairs monthly.15    (5) When a death is presumed to have occurred in this State 16but the body cannot be located, a death certificate may be 17prepared by the State Registrar upon receipt of an order of a 18court of competent jurisdiction which includes the finding of 19facts required to complete the death certificate. Such death 20certificate shall be marked "Presumptive" and shall show on 21its face the date of the registration and shall identify the 22court and the date of the judgment.23(Source: P.A. 102-257, eff. 1-1-22; 102-844, eff. 1-1-23; 24103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-741, eff. 8-2-24.)